California, session 20252026, SB1042.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 11 (commencing with Section 5400) is added to Chapter 1 of Division 3 of the Vehicle Code, to read: Article 11. Vehicle Registration Modernization Study5400. (a) The Legislature requests the Milton Marks “Little Hoover” Commission on California State Government Organization and Economy, established pursuant to Section 8501 of the Government Code, to conduct a study on modernizing motor vehicle registration in the state.(b) The study shall include, at a minimum, an analysis of the effect of all of the following:(1) Eliminating physical registration stickers.(2) Authorizing the department to issue or renew a motor vehicle registration for two years.(3) Authorizing installment payments for motor vehicle registration.5401. (a) The Legislature requests the commission to submit a report to the Legislature on the study conducted pursuant to Section 5400 no later than January 1, 2028.(b) The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.5402. This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.